Washington statutes.
RCW 4.96.050

Bond not required.

No bond is required of any local governmental entity for any purpose in any case in any of the courts of the state of Washington and all local governmental entities shall be, on proper showing, entitled to any orders, injunctions, and writs of whatever nature without bond, notwithstanding the provisions of any existing statute requiring that bonds be furnished by private parties.

[ 1993 c 449 s 5.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1993 c 449: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.